New Jersey, session 222, A1763.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     There is a lack of viable employment opportunities in New Jersey for individuals recently released from prison; b.    Employment opportunities are necessary to curtail the rate of recidivism and to reincorporate recently incarcerated individuals back into civil society; c.     Individuals with low educational attainment are at greater risk of engaging in criminal activity since they have tremendous difficulty finding and maintaining adequate jobs; and d.    Labor organizations, given their unique understanding of their communitys economic conditions are in the best position to identify employment opportunities for recently incarcerated individuals and to propose a plan for attracting such employment opportunities into their respective trades. 2.    There is established, in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Second Chance Program (program).  The purpose of the program shall be to provide real and lasting career opportunities for formerly incarcerated individuals through, and in consultation with, labor organizations in order to reduce recidivism. For the purposes of this section, labor organization means a labor organization as defined in section 3 of 29 U.S.C. s.402. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.